Wyoming, session 2026, SF0109.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 11-53-101 and 11-53-102 are created
to read:

CHAPTER 53
SF0109

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0367
COWBOY STATE AGRICULTURAL TRUST

11-53-101. Cowboy state agricultural trust fund;
requirements; investments; expenditures.

(a) As used in this chapter:

(i) "Committee" means the cowboy state
agricultural trust fund committee created in W.S.
11-53-102(a);

(ii) "Fund" means the cowboy state agricultural
trust fund created in subsection (b) of this section.

(b) There is created the cowboy state agricultural
trust fund. The state treasurer shall invest the fund in
accordance with law. Except for investment earnings from
the fund and other funds granted or appropriated to the
fund for specific purposes and expenditures, all funds
deposited into or within the fund are intended to be
inviolate and constitute a permanent or perpetual trust
fund. In adopting investment policy statements for the
fund, the state loan and investment board, in consultation
SF0109

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0367
with the investment funds committee, shall seek to preserve
the balance of the fund in a manner that strives for the
highest possible risk-adjusted total net return consistent
with an appropriate level of safety and liquidity.

(c) Earnings from the investment of the fund shall be
continuously appropriated to the committee for the purposes
specified in this article.

(d) The committee may accept contributions, grants,
gifts, transfers, bequests and donations to the fund. Funds
received by the committee under this subsection shall be
used by the committee for the purposes specified in this
article unless the grantor has limited the purposes or
terms of expenditure of the funds received under this
subsection.

(e) Earnings from the fund shall only be expended by
the committee to provide grants for the following purposes:

(i) Programs and initiatives related to
production agriculture at the University of Wyoming college
of agriculture, life sciences and natural resources;
SF0109

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0367

(ii) Agriculture workforce development programs
and initiatives at the University of Wyoming and Wyoming
community colleges. For purposes of this paragraph,
workforce development programs shall provide support for
production agriculture, value-added agriculture or natural
resource personnel who are or will be employed by federal
and state agencies and shall incorporate practical
experience, work experience and internships;

(iii) Agriculture education or classroom
programs that provide curricula or other educational
resources for agriculture education in Wyoming schools;

(iv) Support or development for
agriculture-focused classes in Wyoming high schools that
offer concurrent credit with a Wyoming community college;

(v) Value-added agricultural projects;

(vi) The enhancement of business-related
education for agriculture, including marketing, addressing
SF0109

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0367
regulatory burdens to new markets and business strategies
for growing agricultural business;

(vii) The incorporation of new technologies and
practices into operational practice in production
agriculture;

(viii) Other efforts, programs and initiatives
to expand the productivity, profitability or sustainability
of Wyoming agriculture.

(f) Grants made by the committee under this section:

(i) May be made to Wyoming government entities,
educational institutions and other qualified public
entities incorporated in Wyoming;

(ii) Shall be matched in the ratio of one dollar
($1.00) of cowboy state agricultural trust funds to not
less than one dollar ($1.00) of matching nonstate funds;

SF0109

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0367
(iii) Shall require the recipient to report to
the committee not less than annually on the expenditure of
grant funds received under this section.

11-53-102. Cowboy state agricultural trust fund
committee.

(a) There is created the cowboy state agricultural
trust fund committee consisting of the following persons:

(i) The director;

(ii) The dean of the University of Wyoming
college of agriculture, life sciences and natural resources
or the dean's designee;

(iii) The chief executive officer of the Wyoming
business council or the officer's designee;

(iv) A representative of the Wyoming community
college commission;

SF0109

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0367
(v) A representative of Wyoming high schools who
teaches vocational or career and technical education;

(vi) A designee of a Wyoming nonprofit entity
that supports agriculture in the classroom or similar
agricultural education initiatives;

(vii) Three (3) persons actively involved in
production agriculture in Wyoming.

(b) The governor shall appoint to the committee the
persons specified in paragraphs (a)(iv) through (vii) of
this section with the advice and consent of the senate in
accordance with W.S. 28-12-101 through 28-12-103. The
persons appointed to the committee as specified in
paragraphs (a)(iv) through (vii) of this section shall be
appointed for three (3) year terms, except as otherwise
provided in this subsection. For the initial appointments
made under this subsection, two (2) members shall be
appointed for a one (1) year term, two (2) members shall be
appointed for a term of two (2) years and two (2) members
shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years. The
persons appointed to the committee as specified in
SF0109

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0367
paragraphs (a)(i) through (iii) of this section shall serve
during the term of their appointment or employment. The
governor may remove any committee member as provided in
W.S. 9-1-202.

(c) The department shall provide staffing and
administrative support for the committee.

(d) The committee shall:

(i) Develop and provide an application process
for the awarding of grants from the fund;

(ii) Oversee the expenditure of grant funds
awarded under this article to ensure compliance with this
article and any other requirements under law;

(iii) Report to the joint agriculture, state and
public lands and water resources interim committee on the
cowboy state agricultural trust fund and grants awarded
under this article not later than October 1, 2027 and each
October 1 thereafter through October 1, 2032.

SF0109

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0367
Section 2. On the effective date of this act, the
state auditor shall transfer ten million dollars
($10,000,000.00) from the general fund to the cowboy state
agricultural trust fund, as created by section 1 of this
act.

Section 3. The Wyoming department of agriculture
shall promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.

Section 4.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.

(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
SF0109